Maryland, session 2025, HB0137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–722.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0137*

HOUSE BILL 137
(e) (1) A registrant or juvenile registrant who is a student may receive an
education in accordance with State law in any of the following locations:
(i) a location other than a public or nonpublic elementary or
secondary school, including by:
1. participating in the Home and Hospital Teaching Program
for Students; or
2. participating in or attending a program approved by a
county board under paragraph (2) of this subsection;
(ii) a Regional Institute for Children and Adolescents; or
(iii) a nonpublic educational program as provided by § 8–406 of the
Education Article if:
1. the registrant or juvenile registrant has notified an agent
or employee of the nonpublic educational program that the registrant or juvenile registrant
is required to register under this subtitle; and
2. the registrant or juvenile registrant has been given
specific written permission by an agent or employee of the nonpublic educational program
to attend the nonpublic educational program.
(2) Each county board shall develop and adopt a policy that enables a
registrant or juvenile registrant who is a student to receive an education as described under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) The State Board shall develop and adopt guidelines and a model policy
to assist a county board with the development of a policy under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
Article – Education
7–312.
(A) IF A CHILD HAS BEEN CHARGED WITH A CRIME OF VIOLENCE, AS
DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, THE CHILD IS PROHIBITED
FROM IN–PERSON ATTENDANCE AT A PUBLIC SCHOOL UNTIL THE CHILD IS FOUND
NOT DELINQUENT OR THE CHARGE IS DISMISSED.
(B) (1) EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL PROVIDE ALTERNATIVE
EDUCATIONAL OPTIONS SEPARATE FROM OTHER STUDENTS FOR CHILDREN

HOUSE BILL 137 3
PROHIBITED FROM IN–PERSON ATTENDANCE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) THE ALTERNATIVE EDUCATIONAL OPTIONS PROVIDED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL ALIGN WITH THE REQUIRED POLICY ADOPTED BY COUNTY
BOARDS UNDER § 11–722(E) OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.